Rhode Island, session 2025, SB657.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-6.5-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-6.5 entitled "Rhode
Island Tax Amnesty Act of 2017" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-6.5-4. Interest under tax amnesty.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, interest on any taxes paid for periods
covered under the amnesty provisions of this chapter shall be computed at the rate imposed under
§ 44-1-7, reduced by twenty-five percent (25%); provided, however, interest and penalties shall be
waived on unpaid delinquent taxes, provided that the tax is paid in full during a one-week tax
amnesty period, to be determined by the tax administrator, for each fiscal year. The tax
administrator shall make available suitable forms with instructions for making tax payments.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002252
========